Washington statutes.
RCW 13.24.021

Designation of state council.

Pursuant to the compact created in RCW 13.24.011, the governor is hereby authorized and empowered to designate a state council as required in Article IX of the compact.

[ 2003 c 180 s 2.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2003 c 180: See note following RCW 13.24.011.